North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-32 Limited Liability Company Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 41]

10-32-01.
Citation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-02.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 55, § 26; 1995, ch. 103, § 46; 1997, ch. 103, § 99; 1999, ch. 95, § 49; 2001, ch. 112, § 15; 2003, ch. 85, § 24; 2005, ch. 100, § 47; 2007, ch. 101, § 38; 2007, ch. 354, § 4; 2009, ch. 106, §
25; 2011, ch. 87, § 25; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-02.1.
Legal recognition of electronic records and electronic signatures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 85, § 25; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-02.2.
Knowledge and notice. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 48; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-03.
Reservation of legislative power. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 55, § 30.

10-32-03.1.
Reservation of legislative right. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 101, § 39; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-04.
Purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2009, ch. 106, § 26; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-05.
Organizers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-06.
Number of members required. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 100; 1999, ch. 95, § 50; 2009, ch. 106, § 27; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-07.
Articles of organization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 47; 1997, ch. 103, § 101; 1999, ch. 50, § 27; 1999, ch. 95, § 51; 2001, ch. 112, § 16; 2003, ch. 85, § 26; 2005, ch. 100, § 49; 2007, ch. 99, § 27; 2007, ch. 101, § 40; 2011, ch. 87, § 26; 2013, ch. 89, § 9; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-08.
Filing of articles of organization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-09.
Effective date of organization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2011, ch. 87, § 27; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-10.
Limited liability company name. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 48; 1997, ch. 103, § 102; 1999, ch. 95, § 52; 2003, ch. 85, § 27; 2005, ch. 384, § 3; 2005, ch. 100, § 50; 2005, ch. 384, § 3; 2007, ch. 101, § 41; 2009, ch. 106, § 28; 2011, ch. 87, § 28; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41 .

10-32-11.
Reserved name. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 103; 1999, ch. 95, § 53; 2003, ch. 85, § 28; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-12.
Registered office and agent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 104; 2005, ch. 100, § 51; 2007, ch. 99, § 28; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-13.
Change of registered office or agent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 105; 1999, ch. 95, § 54; 2003, ch. 85, § 29; 2005 ch. 100, § 52; 2007, ch. 99, § 29; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-14.
Amendment of articles of organization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2013, ch. 89, § 10; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-15.
Procedure for amendment before contribution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 106; 2003, ch. 85, § 30; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-16.
Procedure for amendment after contribution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 107; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-17.
Class or series voting on amendments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 108; 1999, ch. 95, § 55; 2003, ch. 85, § 31; 2005, ch. 100, § 53; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-18.
Articles of amendment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2009, ch. 106, § 29; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-19.
Effect of amendment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 109; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-20.
Filing of articles of amendment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2005, ch. 100, § 54; 2009, ch. 106, § 30; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-21.
Effective date of articles of amendment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-22.
Amendment of articles of organization in court-supervised reorganization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 110; 1999, ch. 95, § 56; 2003, ch. 85, § 32; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-23.
General powers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 49; 1997, ch. 103, § 111; 1999, ch. 95, § 57; 2001, ch. 112, § 17; 2003, ch. 85, § 33; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-24.
Limited liability company seal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2005, ch. 100, § 55; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-25.
Defense of ultra vires. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-26.
Unauthorized assumption of limited liability company powers — Liability. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-27.
Transaction of business outside North Dakota. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2007, ch. 101, § 42; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-28.
Nature of a membership interest and statement of interest owned. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 50; 1997, ch. 103, § 112; 1997, ch. 362, § 2; 1999, ch. 95, § 58; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-29.
Personal liability. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-30.
Termination of a membership interest. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 51; 1999, ch. 95, § 59; 2001, ch. 112, § 18; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-31.
Assignment of financial rights. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 52; 1997, ch. 103, § 113; 1999, ch. 95, § 60; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-32.
Assignment of governance rights. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 53; 1997, ch. 103, § 114; 1999, ch. 95, § 61; 2001, ch. 112, § 19; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-33.
Effective date of assignments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 54; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-34.
Rights of judgment creditor. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 115; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-35.
Powers of estate of a deceased or incompetent member. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 55; 1999, ch. 95, § 62; 2001, ch. 112, § 20; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-36.
Sharing of profits and losses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 63; 2003, ch. 85, § 34; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-37.
Preemptive rights. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 116; 1999, ch. 95, § 64; 2003, ch. 85, § 35; 2007, ch. 101, § 43; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-38.
Regular meetings of members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 117; 1999, ch. 95, § 65; 2003, ch. 85, § 36; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-39.
Special meetings of members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 118; 1999, ch. 95, § 66; 2003, ch. 85, § 37; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-39.1.
Court-ordered meeting of members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 119; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-40.
Notice of member meetings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 120; 1999, ch. 95, § 67; 2003, ch. 85, § 38; 2011, ch. 87, § 29; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-40.1.
Voting rights. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 121; 1999, ch. 95, § 68; 2003, ch. 85, § 39; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-40.2.
Voting list. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 122; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-41.
Electronic communications. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-32-42.
Act of members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 123; 1999, ch. 95, § 69; 2001, ch. 112, § 21; 2005, ch. 100, § 56; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-42.1.
Contractual requirement to submit matter to members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 101, § 44; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-43.
Member action without a meeting. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 124; 1999, ch. 95, § 70; 2001, ch. 112, § 22; 2003, ch. 85, § 40; 2005, ch. 100, § 57; 2007, ch. 101, § 45; 2009, ch. 106, §
31; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-43.1.
Member action by ballot. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 125; 1999, ch. 95, § 71; 2005, ch. 100, § 58; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-43.2.
Remote communications for member meetings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 126; 2003, ch. 85, § 41; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-44.
Quorum of members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 127; 1999, ch. 95, § 72; 2001, ch. 112, § 23; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-45.
Voting rights. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-32-46.
Voting list. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-32-47.
Voting by organizations and legal representatives. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 128; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-48.
Proxies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 129; 1999, ch. 95, § 73; 2003, ch. 85, § 42; 2009, ch. 106, §
32; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-48.1.
Acceptance of member act by the limited liability company. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 130; 1999, ch. 95, § 74; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-49.
Member voting agreements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 75; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-50.
Member-control agreements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 56; 1997, ch. 103, § 131; 1999, ch. 95, § 76; 2001, ch. 112, § 24; 2003, ch. 85, § 43; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-51.
Required records and information. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 57; 1997, ch. 103, § 132; 1999, ch. 95, § 77; 2003, ch. 85, § 44; 2005, ch. 100, § 59; 2011, ch. 87, § 30; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-52.
Financial statements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 133; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-52.1.
Equitable remedies for members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 134; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-53.
Actions by members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 135; 2005, ch. 100, § 60; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-54.
Rights of dissenting members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 136; 1999, ch. 95, § 78; 2001, ch. 112, § 25; 2003, ch. 85, § 45; 2005, ch. 100, § 61; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-55.
Procedures for asserting dissenters’ rights. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 137; 1999, ch. 95, § 79; 2003, ch. 85, § 46; 2005, ch. 100, § 62; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-56.
Authorization, form, and acceptance of contributions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 138; 1999, ch. 50, § 28; 1999, ch. 95, § 80; 2003, ch. 85, § 47; 2005, ch. 100, § 63; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-57.
Restatement of value of previous contributions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 81; 2003, ch. 85, § 48; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-58.
Contribution agreements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 139; 1999, ch. 95, § 82; 2003, ch. 85, § 49; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-59.
Contribution allowance agreements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 83; 2001, ch. 112, § 26; 2003, ch. 85, § 50; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-60.
Sharing of distributions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 84; 2003, ch. 85, § 51; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-61.
Interim distributions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 85; 2003, ch. 85, § 52; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-62.
Distribution in kind. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 86; 2001, ch. 112, § 27; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-63.
Status as a creditor. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-64.
Limitations on distribution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 58; 1997, ch. 103, § 140; 1999, ch. 95, § 87; 2003, ch. 85, § 53; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-65.
Liability of members for illegal distributions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-66.
Liability of governors for illegal distributions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 141; 1999, ch. 95, § 88; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-67.
Organization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 142; 1999, ch. 95, § 89; 2003, ch. 85, § 54; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-68.
Bylaws. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 143; 1999, ch. 95, § 90; 2001, ch. 112, § 28; 2003, ch. 85, § 55; 2011, ch. 87, § 31; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-69.
Board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2001, ch. 112, § 29; 2003, ch. 85, § 56; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-70.
Number of governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 91; 2001, ch. 112, § 30; 2003, ch. 85, § 57; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-71.
Qualifications and election of governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 92; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-72.
Terms of governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 144; 1999, ch. 95, § 93; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-73.
Acts not void or voidable. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2003, ch. 85, § 58; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-74.
Compensation of governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 94; 2003, ch. 85, § 59; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-75.
Classification of governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 95; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-76.
Voting for governors and cumulative voting. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 96; 2001, ch. 112, § 31; 2003, ch. 85, § 60; 2005, ch. 100, § 64; 2007, ch. 101, § 46; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-77.
Resignation of governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 145; 2003, ch. 85, § 61; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-78.
Nonjudicial removal of governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 146; 1999, ch. 95, § 97; 2001, ch. 112, § 32; 2003, ch. 85, § 62; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-78.1.
Removal of governors by judicial proceeding. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 147; 1999, ch. 95, § 98; 2003, ch. 85, § 63; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-79.
Board vacancies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 148; 1999, ch. 95, § 99; 2003, ch. 85, § 64; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-80.
Board meetings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 149; 1999, ch. 95, § 100; 2001, ch. 112, § 33; 2003, ch. 85, § 65; 2005, ch. 100, § 65; 2009, ch. 106, § 33; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-81.
Absent governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 150; 1999, ch. 95, § 101; 2003, ch. 85, § 66; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-82.
Quorum of governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1999, ch. 95, § 102; 2001, ch. 112, § 34; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-83.
Act of the board. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 151; 1999, ch. 95, § 103; 2003, ch. 85, § 67; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-84.
Action without a meeting by governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 152; 1999, ch. 95, § 104; 2003, ch. 85, § 68; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-85.
Board committees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 153; 1999, ch. 95, § 105; 2003, ch. 85, § 69; 2007, ch. 101, § 47; 2009, ch. 106, § 34; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-86.
Standard of conduct for governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 154; 1999, ch. 95, § 106; 2001, ch. 112, § 35; 2003, ch. 85, § 70; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-87.
Governor conflicts of interest. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 155; 1999, ch. 95, § 107; 2001, ch. 112, § 36; 2003, ch. 85, § 71; 2009, ch. 106, § 35; 2011, ch. 87, § 32; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-88.
Managers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 59; 1997, ch. 103, § 156; 1999, ch. 95, § 108; 2003, ch. 85, § 72; 2011, ch. 87, § 33; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-89.
Duties of managers and agents. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 60; 1997, ch. 103, § 157; 1999, ch. 95, § 109; 2001, ch. 112, § 37; 2003, ch. 85, § 73; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-90.
Other managers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-32-91.
Multiple managerial positions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 158; 2005, ch. 100, § 66; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-92.
Managers deemed elected. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 159; 2003, ch. 85, § 74; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-93.
Contract rights. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 160; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-94.
Resignation, removal, and vacancies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 161; 1999, ch. 95, § 110; 2003, ch. 85, § 75; 2007, ch. 101, § 48; 2011, ch. 87, § 34; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-95.
Delegation by managers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 162; 1999, ch. 95, § 111; 2003, ch. 85, § 76; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-96.
Standard of conduct for managers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 163; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-97.
Loans, guarantees, and suretyship. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 61; 1997, ch. 103, § 164; 2003, ch. 85, § 77; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-98.
Advances. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 62; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-99.
Indemnification. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 63; 1997, ch. 103, § 165; 1999, ch. 95, § 112; 2001, ch. 112, § 38; 2003, ch. 85, § 78; 2005, ch. 100, § 67; 2009, ch. 106, § 36; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-100.
Merger — Exchange — Transfer. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 166; 1999, ch. 95, § 113; 2005, ch. 100, § 68; 2007, ch. 101, § 49; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-101.
Plan of merger or exchange. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 167; 1999, ch. 95, § 114; 2007, ch. 101, § 50; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-102.
Plan approval. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 168; 1999, ch. 95, § 115; 2001, ch. 112, § 39; 2005, ch. 100, § 69; 2007, ch. 101, § 51; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-103.
Articles of merger — Certificate. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 169; 1999, ch. 95, § 116; 2007, ch. 101, § 52; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-104.
Merger of subsidiary into parent. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 170; 1999, ch. 95, § 117; 2001, ch. 112, § 40; 2003, ch. 85, § 79; 2007, ch. 101, § 53; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-105.
Abandonment of plan of merger. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 171; 1999, ch. 95, § 118; 2007, ch. 101, § 54; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-106.
Effective date of merger or exchange and effect. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 172; 1999, ch. 95, § 119; 2005, ch. 100, § 70; 2007, ch. 101, § 55; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-106.1.
Continuance of limited liability company authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 71; 2007, ch. 101, § 56; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-107.
Merger or exchange with foreign limited liability company or foreign organization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 173; 1999, ch. 50, § 29; 1999, ch. 95, § 120; 2005, ch. 100, § 72; 2007, ch. 99, § 30; 2007, ch. 101, § 57; 2009, ch. 106, § 37; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-108.
Transfer of assets — When permitted. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 64; 1997, ch. 103, § 174; 2003, ch. 85, § 80; 2005, ch. 100, § 73; 2007, ch. 101, § 58; 2011, ch. 87, § 35; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-108.1.
Conversion. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 74; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-108.2.
Plan of conversion. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 75; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-108.3.
Plan approval and amendment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 76; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-108.4.
Articles of conversion. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 77; 2009, ch. 106, § 38; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-108.5.
Abandonment of conversion. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 78; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-108.6.
Effective date of conversion — Effect. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 79; 2007, ch. 99, § 31; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-109.
Methods of dissolution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 65; 1997, ch. 103, § 175; 1999, ch. 95, § 121; 2001, ch. 112, § 41; 2009, ch. 106, § 39; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-110.
Voluntary dissolution and termination prior to accepting contributions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 176; 2009, ch. 106, § 40; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-111.
Voluntary dissolution after accepting contributions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2009, ch. 106, § 41; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-112.
Filing notice of dissolution — Effect. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 66; 1999, ch. 95, § 122; 2003, ch. 85, § 81; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-113.
Procedure in winding up. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 177; 1999, ch. 95, § 123; 2003, ch. 85, § 82; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-114.
Winding-up procedure for limited liability companies that give notice to creditors and claimants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 67; 1997, ch. 103, § 178; 1999, ch. 95, § 124; 2003, ch. 85, § 83; 2005, ch. 100, § 80; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-115.
Winding-up procedure for limited liability companies that do not give notice to creditors and claimants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 179; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-116.
Revocation of dissolution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-117.
Filing of articles of termination — Effective date of termination — Certificate of termination. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 180; 2003, ch. 85, § 84; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-118.
Supervised voluntary winding up and termination following a voluntary dissolution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-119.
Judicial intervention and equitable remedies, dissolution, and termination. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 181; 1999, ch. 95, § 125; 2001, ch. 112, § 42; 2003, ch. 85, § 85; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-120.
Judicial intervention procedures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-121.
Qualifications of receivers and powers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 182; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-122.
Action by attorney general. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 183; 1999, ch. 95, § 126; 2007, ch. 99, § 32; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-123.
Filing claims in judicial intervention proceedings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-124.
Discontinuance of proceedings for winding up through liquidation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-125.
Decree of termination. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-126.
Filing decree. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-127.
Deposit with administrator of abandoned property of amount due certain persons. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 184; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-128.
Claims barred and exceptions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2009, ch. 106, § 42; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-129.
Right to sue or defend after termination. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-130.
Omitted assets. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-130.1.
Extension after duration expired. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 185; 2003, ch. 85, § 86; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-130.2.
Effect of extension. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 186; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-131.
Disposition of assets upon dissolution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 68; 1999, ch. 95, § 127; 2001, ch. 112, § 43; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-132.
Service of process on limited liability company, foreign limited liability company, and nonresident governors. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 2003, ch. 85, § 87; 2005, ch. 100, § 81; 2007, ch. 99, § 33; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-133.
When a member is not a proper party. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-134.
State interested in proceedings. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-135.
Foreign limited liability company — Governing law. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 187; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-136.
Foreign limited liability company — Name. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 69; 1997, ch. 103, § 188; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-137.
Foreign limited liability company — Admission of foreign limited liability company — Transacting business — Obtaining licenses and permits. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 189; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-138.
Foreign limited liability company — Application for certificate of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 70; 1997, ch. 103, § 190; 2007, ch. 99, § 34; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-139.
Foreign limited liability company — Issuance of certificate of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 191; 2007, ch. 99, § 35; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-140.
Foreign limited liability company — Amendments to the certificate of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 71; 1997, ch. 103, § 192; 1999, ch. 95, § 128; 2009, ch. 106, § 43; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-141.
Foreign limited liability company — Registered agent — Registered office. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 193; 2007, ch. 99, § 36; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-142.
Foreign limited liability company — Merger of foreign limited liability company authorized to transact business in this state. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 194; 1999, ch. 95, § 129; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-143.
Foreign limited liability company — Certificate of withdrawal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 72; 1997, ch. 103, § 195; 2007, ch. 99, § 37; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-144.
Foreign limited liability company — Revocation of certificate of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 73; 1997, ch. 103, § 196; 2005, ch. 100, § 82; 2007, ch. 99, § 38; 2011, ch. 87, § 36; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-145.
Foreign limited liability company — Transaction of business without certificate of authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 197; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-146.
Foreign limited liability company — Transactions not constituting transacting business. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 198; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-147.
Foreign limited liability company — Action by attorney general. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 199; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-148.
Service of process on a foreign limited liability company. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 200; 2005, ch. 100, § 83; 2007, ch. 99, § 39; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-149.
Secretary of state — Annual report of limited liability company and foreign limited liability company. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1995, ch. 103, § 74; 1997, ch. 103, § 201; 1999, ch. 95, § 130; 2003, ch. 85, § 88; 2005, ch. 100, § 84; 2007, ch. 99, § 40; 2009, ch. 106, § 44; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-150.
Secretary of state — Fees and charges. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 202; 1999, ch. 95, § 131; 2001, ch. 112, § 44; 2005, ch. 100, § 85; 2007, ch. 99, § 41; 2009, ch. 106, § 45; 2011, ch. 87, § 37; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-151.
Audit reports and audit of limited liability companies receiving state subsidies for production of alcohol or methanol for combination with gasoline. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 248.

10-32-152.
Secretary of state — Powers — Enforcement — Appeal. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 203; 2005, ch. 100, § 86; 2009, ch. 106, §
46; 2011, ch. 87, § 38; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-152.1.
Delivery to and filing of records by secretary of state and effective date. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 87; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-152.2.
Correcting a filed record. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 100, § 88; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-153.
Secretary of state — Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 204; 2005, ch. 100, § 89; 2011, ch. 87, § 39; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-153.1.
Secretary of state — Confidential records. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 85, § 89; 2005, ch. 100, § 90; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-154.
Secretary of state — Forms. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 205; 2005, ch. 100, § 91; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-155.
Miscellaneous — Foreign trade zones. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 92, § 8; 1997, ch. 103, § 206; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.

10-32-156.
Miscellaneous — Audit reports and audit of limited liability companies receiving state subsidies for production of alcohol or methanol for combination with gasoline. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 103, § 207; Repealed by 2015, ch. 87, § 41.